Utah statutes.
53B-17-804.   Reporting.

(1) (a)  The board, through the director and the board chair, shall provide by no later than July 1 of each year, a written report to the president of the university.

(b)  The report required by this Subsection (1) shall:

(i)  summarize the center's activities and accomplishments in the immediate proceeding calendar year; and

(ii)  provide information and the board's advice and recommendations on how the state, university, and the center can:

(A)  improve workplace health and safety; and

(B)  contribute to economic growth and development in Utah and the surrounding region.

(2) (a)  If the center receives in a fiscal year money from the Eddie P. Mayne Workplace Safety and Occupational Health Funding Program provided for in Section 34A-2-701, the center shall provide a written report:

(i)  by no later than the August 15 following the fiscal year;

(ii)  to the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst;

(iii)  for review by the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee;

(iv)  that accounts for the expenditure of money received in the fiscal year by the center from the Eddie P. Mayne Workplace Safety and Occupational Health Funding Program including impact on workplace safety in Utah; and

(v)  that includes a preliminary statement as to money the center will request from the Eddie P. Mayne Workplace Safety and Occupational Health Funding Program for the fiscal year following the day on which the report is provided.

(b)  A report provided under this Subsection (2) meets the reporting requirements under Subsection 34A-2-701(5)(b)(i)(B).



Amended by Chapter 43, 2013 General Session

